Oklahoma, session 2026, SB926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5009.7 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The state Medicaid program shall, when medically necessary


for the management or treatment of diabetes, cover insulin and


insulin delivery systems. Covered insulin delivery systems shall


include, but not be limited to, a tubeless, wearable insulin pump


that delivers insulin automatically.


B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall seek any federal


approval necessary to implement this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 482 Page 1


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-482 DC 1/19/2025 5:46:07 AM





































Req. No. 482 Page 2